California, session 20252026, AB1307.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 1645.4) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 2. Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 1645.4) is added to Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: Article 2.7. Licensed Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program1645.4. (a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1) “Board” means the Dental Board of California.(2) “License” means a license issued pursuant to subdivision (c).(3) “Participant” means a person who has been issued a license pursuant to subdivision (c).(4) “Program” means the Licensed Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program.(b) (1) The program is hereby created.(2) (A) The board shall accept 30 participating dentists pursuant to the procedures in this section.(B) The board shall maintain an alternate list of program applicants.(C) If a participant leaves the program for any reason, the board shall choose an applicant from the alternate list described in subparagraph (B) to fill the vacancy.(c) The board shall issue a three-year nonrenewable license to practice dentistry to an applicant that who submits an application to the board on a form prescribed by the board and that, as supported by primary source documents provided to the board from an educational institution, certifying body, licensing agency, testing entity, United States government agency, or other official evidence, meets all of the following criteria: (1) The applicant graduated from a dental program accredited by either of the following:(A) Consejo Nacional de Educación Odontológica, A.C.(B) Comités Interinstitucionales para la Evaluación de la Educación Superior.(2) The applicant is certified by the Asociación Dental Mexicana through a written examination that confirms competency of all of the following clinical experiences: (A) Oral diagnosis and treatment planning.(B) Periodontics.(C) Direct restorations.(D) Indirect restorations.(E) Endodontics.(F) Removal prosthodontics.(3) The applicant has a license to practice from the Secretaría de Educación Pública Dirección General de Profesiones.(4) The applicant has satisfactorily completed the Test of English as a Foreign Language by scoring a minimum of 85 or the Occupational English Test with a minimum score of 350.(5) The applicant has satisfactorily completed an orientation program approved by the board in connection with the Licensed Physicians and Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program, as established in former Section 853, that includes all of the following components: (A) Dental protocols.(B) Community clinic history and operations.(C) Dental administration.(D) Dental law and ethics.(E) Managed care standards, practices, and procedures.(F) Medication documentation and script protocols and procedures.(G) The California dental delivery system.(H) Health maintenance organizations.(6) Except as provided by subdivision (d), provide the board with an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number.(d) (1) The board shall issue a license to an applicant who has not provided an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (A) The board determines the applicant is otherwise eligible for a license.(B) The applicant provides evidence to the board that the applicant has sought an appropriate three-year visa and accompanying social security number.(2) (A) A participant who has been issued a license pursuant to paragraph (1) shall provide the board with the social security number within 10 days of receipt of a social security card and related visa.(B) The board may terminate a license if a participant fails to comply with subparagraph (A).(3) If the board determines that a participant has met the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2), the board shall notify the applicant that the applicant may engage in the practice of dentistry under the license issued pursuant to paragraph (1).(e) (1) An applicant shall submit copies of documents establishing that the applicant meets the criteria described in subdivision (c) to the board.(2) A document submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be a primary source document.(3) The board shall confirm the authenticity of a document submitted pursuant to this subdivision.(f) The fee for a license and associated Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Evaluation System fee shall be one thousand two dollars ($1002).(g) The three-year period for a license shall commence on the first day the participant engages in the practice of dentistry.(h) (1) Before engaging in the practice of dentistry, a participant shall do both of the following: (A) Complete an eight-hour infection control program approved by the board. course pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1755.(B) Pass the California Dental Law and Ethics Examination.(2) For each year that a participant has a license, the participant shall comply with Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 1645).(3)Within three months of receiving a license, a participant shall complete eight hours of infection control continuing dental education courses, and thereafter complete at least two hours of those courses per year.(i) (1) A license shall be deemed to be in good standing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of participation and reimbursement in all federal, state, and local health programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) The Medicare Program.(B) The fee-for-service system of the Medi-Cal program.(C) The managed care delivery system of the Medi-Cal program.(D) Private insurance.(2) A license shall not carry any designation that the participant is a participant in the program.(j) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), suspension or revocation of a license shall be governed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670).(2) In addition to the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670), the board shall notify a participant of a suspension or revocation of a license by certified mail, return receipt requested, at the participant’s address of record.(k) Representatives from California and the National Autonomous University of Mexico that executed and implemented the provisions of the former Physicians and Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program shall be the points of contact for all of the following:(1) Securing required documents.(2) Recruiting and vetting candidates.(3) Assisting candidates for this the program in Mexico in meeting all program requirements.(4) Selecting appropriate federally qualified health centers throughout California.(5) Ensuring compliance with program provisions.(6) Developing policy and clinical workshops.(7) Monitoring productivity and increased access to dental care.(8) Assessing the necessity of policy and programmatic improvements.(9) Working with the governments of Mexico and the United States to obtain the visas required for program participation.(l) A participant may only be employed by a federally qualified health center that meets all of the following conditions:(1) The center has at least one health professional shortage area or dental professional shortage area within its service area, as determined by the Department of Health Care Access and Information:(2) The center has dental quality assurance protocols.(3) The center is either of the following:(A) Accredited by any of the following:(i) The Joint Commission.(ii) The Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care.(iii) The National Committee for Quality Assurance.(B) Affiliated with a federally qualified health center that satisfies subparagraph (A).(m) A federally qualified health center that employs a participant shall do all of the following:(1) Continue the peer review protocols and procedures required by the federal government.(2) Work with a dental school in California approved by the board to conduct 10 secondary peer reviews of randomly selected patient encounters with each participant per six-month period and transmit complete records of those encounters to the dental school.(3) Provide all applicable employment benefits, salary, and policies to the participant as it provides to other current employees, including, but not limited to, malpractice insurance.(n) (1) Beginning one year after the program has commenced, an evaluation of the program shall be conducted by either of the following: (A) A dental school in California and either the National Autonomous University of Mexico or a foreign dental school approved by the board. Mexico.(B) An independent consultant selected by the Director of Consumer Affairs.(2) The evaluation required by paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, an evaluation of all of the following: (A) Quality of care provided by participants.(B) Adaptability of participants to California dental standards.(C) Impact on working and administrative environments in the federally qualified health centers employing participants.(D) Impact on interpersonal relations with dental licensed counterparts in the federally qualified health centers employing participants.(E) Responses by patients of participants.(F) Impact on cultural and linguistic services.(G) Increases in dental encounters provided by participants with various patient populations.(H) Increases in the number of various patient populations seeking dental services from federally qualified health centers.(3) The evaluation required by paragraph (1) shall be fully paid for by funds provided by philanthropic foundations.(o) The costs for administering the program shall be fully paid for by funds provided by philanthropic foundations.(p) This section shall become operative six months after the board receives written confirmation that the costs for administering the program have been secured.